Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.576

Judicial dissolution.

On application by a partner the Thurston county superior court may order dissolution of a limited partnership if it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of the limited partnership in conformity with the partnership agreement.

[ 2009 c 188 s 802.]